Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.470

Consolidation—Canvass of votes.

The county canvassing board in each county involved shall canvass the returns in each election. The votes cast in each of such cities shall be canvassed separately, and the statement shall show the whole number of votes cast, the number of votes cast in each city for consolidation, and the number of votes cast in each city against such consolidation. If a proposal for assumption or indebtedness was voted upon in a city in which the indebtedness did not originate, the statement shall show the number of votes cast in such a city for assumption of indebtedness and the number of votes cast against assumption of indebtedness. If a question of the form or plan of government was voted upon, the statement shall show the number of votes cast in each city for each of the optional forms or plans of government. If a name for the proposed consolidated city was voted upon, the statement shall show the number of votes cast in each city for each optional name. A certified copy of such statement shall be filed with the legislative body of each of the cities proposed to be consolidated.

If it appears from such statement of canvass that a majority of the votes cast in each of the cities were in favor of consolidation, the consolidation shall be authorized and shall be effective when the newly elected legislative body members assume office, as provided in RCW 35.10.480.

If a question of the form or plan of government was voted upon, that form or plan receiving the greatest combined number of votes shall become the form or plan of government for the consolidated city. If two or three of the forms or plans of government received the same highest number of votes, the form or plan of government shall be chosen by lot between those receiving the same highest number, where the mayor of the largest of the cities proposed to be consolidated draws the lot at a public meeting.

If a proposition to assume indebtedness was submitted to voters of a city in which the indebtedness did not originate, the proposition shall be deemed approved if approved by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters of the city, and the number of persons voting on the proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the number of votes cast in the city at the last preceding general election. Approval of the proposition authorizes annual property taxes to be levied on the property within the city in which the indebtedness did not originate that are in excess of regular property taxes. However, if the general indebtedness in question was incurred by action of a city legislative body, a proposition for assuming the indebtedness need only be approved by a simple majority vote of the voters of the city in which such indebtedness did not originate.

If a question of the name of the proposed consolidated city was voted upon, that name receiving the greatest combined number of votes shall become the name of the consolidated city. If two proposed names receive the same number of votes, the name shall be chosen by lot, where the mayor of the largest of the cities proposed to be consolidated draws the lot at a public meeting.

[ 1995 c 196 s 2; 1985 c 281 s 10.]